Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.420

Comprehensive plan—Referral to board.

A copy of a comprehensive plan or any part, amendment, extension of or addition thereto, together with the motion of the planning agency approving the same, shall be transmitted to the board for the purpose of being approved by motion and certified as provided in this chapter.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.420. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 42.]